Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.21, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 332.21. A. The Pardon and Parole Board is empowered to

parole a prisoner an inmate who:

1. Is sixty (60) years of age or older;

2. Has served, in actual custody, the shorter of ten (10) years

of the term or terms of imprisonment, or one-third (1/3) of the

total term or terms of imprisonment; and

3. Poses minimal public Does not pose substantial safety risks

warranting continued imprisonment;.



Req. No. 2557 Page 1

4. Is not imprisoned for a crime enumerated in Section 13.1 of

Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes or Section 571 of Title 57 of the

Oklahoma Statutes; and

5. Has not been convicted of a crime that would require the

person to be subject to the registration requirements of the Sex

Offenders Registration Act.

B. The authority to grant parole under Section 332.2 of Title

57 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title shall rest with the Pardon

and Parole Board.

C. The Pardon and Parole Board shall use an evidence-based

risk-assessment instrument to assess the public safety risk posed by

aging prisoners inmates upon release. Such instrument shall include

the health status of the inmates.

D. Unless eligible for release at an earlier date, an aging

prisoner inmate who has been committed to the Department of

Corrections for a term or terms of imprisonment shall have the

ability to request a parole hearing before the Pardon and Parole

Board if the prisoner inmate has served, in actual custody, the

shorter of:

1. Ten (10) years of the term or terms of actual imprisonment;

or

2. One-third (1/3) of the total term or terms of imprisonment.





Req. No. 2557 Page 2

E. Once a prisoner an inmate requests a parole hearing under

subsection A of this section, the Pardon and Parole Board may shall

place the prisoner inmate on the next available docket.

F. The Pardon and Parole Board may shall grant parole to a

prisoner an inmate if the Board finds by a preponderance of the

evidence that the prisoner inmate, if released, can live and remain

at liberty without posing a substantial risk to public safety.

G. The Pardon and Parole Board may shall use the selected

evidence-based risk-assessment instrument to make the determination

provided for in subsection F of this section.

H. The Pardon and Parole Board may provide the prisoner inmate

the opportunity to speak on his or her own behalf and the option of

having counsel present at the parole hearing.

I. For purposes of this section:

1. “Aging prisoner” “Aging inmate” means any person imprisoned

by the Department of Corrections who is sixty (60) years of age or

older; and

2. “Evidence-based” means programs or practices that have been

scientifically tested in controlled studies and proven to be

effective.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.



60-2-2557 CN 12/15/2025 2:14:21 PM



Req. No. 2557 Page 3